Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.240

State of emergency—Disorderly conduct after emergency proclaimed—Penalty.

After the proclamation of a state of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010, every person who:

(1) Wilfully causes public inconvenience, annoyance, or alarm, or recklessly creates a risk thereof, by:

(a) engaging in fighting or in violent, tumultuous, or threatening behavior; or

(b) making an unreasonable noise or an offensively coarse utterance, gesture, or display, or addressing abusive language to any person present; or

(c) dispersing any lawful procession or meeting of persons, not being a peace officer of this state and without lawful authority; or

(d) creating a hazardous or physically offensive condition which serves no legitimate purpose; or

(2) Engages with at least one other person in a course of conduct as defined in subsection (1) of this section which is likely to cause substantial harm or serious inconvenience, annoyance, or alarm, and refuses or knowingly fails to obey an order to disperse made by a peace officer shall be guilty of disorderly conduct and be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days or fined not more than one thousand dollars or by both fine and imprisonment.

[ 2011 c 96 s 27; 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.